Utah statutes.
59-12-205.   Ordinances to conform with statutory amendments -- Distribution of tax revenues -- Determination of population.

(1)  A county, city, or town, in order to maintain in effect sales and use tax ordinances adopted pursuant to Section 59-12-204, shall, within 30 days of an amendment to an applicable provision of Part 1, Tax Collection, adopt amendments to the county's, city's, or town's sales and use tax ordinances as required to conform to the amendments to Part 1, Tax Collection.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsections (3) through (5) and subject to Subsection (6):

(a)  50% of each dollar collected from the sales and use tax authorized by this part shall be distributed to each county, city, and town on the basis of the percentage that the population of the county, city, or town bears to the total population of all counties, cities, and towns in the state; and

(b) (i)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(b)(ii), 50% of each dollar collected from the sales and use tax authorized by this part shall be distributed to each county, city, and town on the basis of the location of the transaction as determined under Sections 59-12-211 through 59-12-215; and

(ii)  50% of each dollar collected from the sales and use tax authorized by this part within a project area described in a project area plan adopted by the military installation development authority under Title 63H, Chapter 1, Military Installation Development Authority Act, shall be distributed to the military installation development authority created in Section 63H-1-201.

(3) (a)  Beginning on July 1, 2011, and ending on June 30, 2016, the commission shall each year distribute to a county, city, or town the distribution required by this Subsection (3) if:

(i)  the county, city, or town is a:

(A)  county of the third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class;

(B)  city of the fifth class; or

(C)  town;

(ii)  the county, city, or town received a distribution under this section for the calendar year beginning on January 1, 2008, that was less than the distribution under this section that the county, city, or town received for the calendar year beginning on January 1, 2007;

(iii) (A)  for a county described in Subsection (3)(a)(i)(A), the county had located within the unincorporated area of the county for one or more days during the calendar year beginning on January 1, 2008, an establishment described in NAICS Industry Group 2121, Coal Mining, or NAICS Code 213113, Support Activities for Coal Mining, of the 2002 North American Industry Classification System of the federal Executive Office of the President, Office of Management and Budget; or

(B)  for a city described in Subsection (3)(a)(i)(B) or a town described in Subsection (3)(a)(i)(C), the city or town had located within the city or town for one or more days during the calendar year beginning on January 1, 2008, an establishment described in NAICS Industry Group 2121, Coal Mining, or NAICS Code 213113, Support Activities for Coal Mining, of the 2002 North American Industry Classification System of the federal Executive Office of the President, Office of Management and Budget; and

(iv) (A)  for a county described in Subsection (3)(a)(i)(A), at least one establishment described in Subsection (3)(a)(iii)(A) located within the unincorporated area of the county for one more days during the calendar year beginning on January 1, 2008, was not the holder of a direct payment permit under Section 59-12-107.1; or

(B)  for a city described in Subsection (3)(a)(i)(B) or a town described in Subsection (3)(a)(i)(C), at least one establishment described in Subsection (3)(a)(iii)(B) located within a city or town for one or more days during the calendar year beginning on January 1, 2008, was not the holder of a direct payment permit under Section 59-12-107.1.

(b)  The commission shall make the distribution required by this Subsection (3) to a county, city, or town described in Subsection (3)(a):

(i)  from the distribution required by Subsection (2)(a); and

(ii)  before making any other distribution required by this section.

(c) (i)  For purposes of this Subsection (3), the distribution is the amount calculated by multiplying the fraction calculated under Subsection (3)(c)(ii) by $333,583.

(ii)  For purposes of Subsection (3)(c)(i):

(A)  the numerator of the fraction is the difference calculated by subtracting the distribution a county, city, or town described in Subsection (3)(a) received under this section for the calendar year beginning on January 1, 2008, from the distribution under this section that the county, city, or town received for the calendar year beginning on January 1, 2007; and

(B)  the denominator of the fraction is $333,583.

(d)  A distribution required by this Subsection (3) is in addition to any other distribution required by this section.

(4) (a)  For fiscal years beginning with fiscal year 1983-84 and ending with fiscal year 2005-06, a county, city, or town may not receive a tax revenue distribution less than .75% of the taxable sales within the boundaries of the county, city, or town.

(b)  The commission shall proportionally reduce monthly distributions to any county, city, or town that, but for the reduction, would receive a distribution in excess of 1% of the sales and use tax revenue collected within the boundaries of the county, city, or town.

(5) (a)  As used in this Subsection (5):

(i)  "Eligible county, city, or town" means a county, city, or town that receives $2,000 or more in tax revenue distributions in accordance with Subsection (4) for each of the following fiscal years:

(A)  fiscal year 2002-03;

(B)  fiscal year 2003-04; and

(C)  fiscal year 2004-05.

(ii)  "Minimum tax revenue distribution" means the greater of:

(A)  the total amount of tax revenue distributions an eligible county, city, or town receives from a tax imposed in accordance with this part for fiscal year 2000-01; or

(B)  the total amount of tax revenue distributions an eligible county, city, or town receives from a tax imposed in accordance with this part for fiscal year 2004-05.

(b) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (5)(b)(ii), beginning with fiscal year 2006-07 and ending with fiscal year 2012-13, an eligible county, city, or town shall receive a tax revenue distribution for a tax imposed in accordance with this part equal to the greater of:

(A)  the payment required by Subsection (2); or

(B)  the minimum tax revenue distribution.

(ii)  If the tax revenue distribution required by Subsection (5)(b)(i) for an eligible county, city, or town is equal to the amount described in Subsection (5)(b)(i)(A) for three consecutive fiscal years, for fiscal years beginning with the fiscal year immediately following that three consecutive fiscal year period, the eligible county, city, or town shall receive the tax revenue distribution equal to the payment required by Subsection (2).

(c)  For a fiscal year beginning with fiscal year 2013-14 and ending with fiscal year 2015-16, an eligible county, city, or town shall receive the minimum tax revenue distribution for that fiscal year if for fiscal year 2012-13 the payment required by Subsection (2) to that eligible county, city, or town is less than or equal to the product of:

(i)  the minimum tax revenue distribution; and

(ii)  .90.

(6) (a)  Population figures for purposes of this section shall be based on the most recent official census or census estimate of the United States Census Bureau.

(b)  If a needed population estimate is not available from the United States Census Bureau, population figures shall be derived from the estimate from the Utah Population Estimates Committee created by executive order of the governor.

(c)  The population of a county for purposes of this section shall be determined only from the unincorporated area of the county.



Amended by Chapter 9, 2012 General Session

